Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska69-2437
Permit; nontransferable.

A permit to carry a concealed handgun shall be issued to a specific individual only and shall not be transferred from one person to another.

Laws 2006, LB 454, § 11.